Hawaii statutes.
§660-22 Disobeying writ or order to show
cause, penalties. Any person who neglects or refuses promptly to perform
any duty imposed upon such person by virtue of any writ of habeas corpus or
order to show cause, conformably to this chapter, shall be responsible in a
civil action to any person aggrieved for damages occasioned thereby, and may be
fined not more than $5,000, or imprisoned at hard labor not more than ten
years, or both. [L 1870, c 32, §26; RL 1925, §2745; RL 1935, §4330; RL 1945,
§10371; am L 1953, c 101, §11; RL 1955, §239-22; HRS §660-22; gen ch 1993]

Cross References

Classification of offense and authorized punishment, see
§§701-107, 706-610(2), 706-640, and 706-660.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next